California statutes. Vehicle Code
(A) The carrier identification number issued by the United States Department of Transportation.

(B) A valid operating authority number.

(C) A
 valid motor carrier of property number.

(3) (A) A copy of the rental agreement entered into by the lessor and the vehicle operator is in the vehicle or combination of vehicles.

(B) The rental agreement shall be available for inspection immediately upon the request of
 an
 authorized employee of the department, any regularly employed and salaried police officer or deputy sheriff, or any reserve police officer or reserve deputy sheriff listed in Section 830.6 of the Penal Code.

(C) If the rented vehicle or combination of vehicles is operated in conjunction with a commercial enterprise, the rental agreement shall include the operator’s carrier identification number or motor carrier of property permit number.

(c) A vehicle or combination of vehicles that is in compliance with Section 390.21 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall be deemed to be in compliance with subdivision (b).

(d) All names, trademarks, and other identifiers for companies no longer in business, no longer operating with the same name, or no longer operating under the same operating authority, shall be removed from or covered over on every motor vehicle or combination of vehicles listed in subdivision (a), within 60 days from the change of company ownership or operation. Those vehicles or combinations of vehicles shall be remarked pursuant to subdivision (a) before they may be operated on the highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 311, Sec. 8.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

27901.

The display of the name or trademark shall be in letters in sharp contrast to the background and shall be of such size, shape, and color as to be readily legible during daylight hours from a distance of 50 feet.

This section does not prohibit additional displays not inconsistent with this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

27902.

Section 27900 does not apply to any motor vehicle having an unladen weight of 6,000 pounds or less or to any vehicle towed by such motor vehicles, or to any motor vehicle operating under manufacturers, dealers, or transporters special plates, or to any motor vehicle operated by a passenger stage corporation subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1021.)
-------------------------------------------

27903.

(a) A vehicle transporting an explosive, blasting agent, flammable liquid, flammable solid, oxidizing material, corrosive, compressed gas, poison, radioactive material, or other hazardous materials, of the type and in quantities that require the display of placards or markings on the vehicle exterior by the United States Department of Transportation pursuant to Parts 172, 173, and 177 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall display those placards and markings in the manner and under conditions prescribed by those regulations.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a vehicle shall not display hazardous materials placards or markings unless permitted or required by Subparts D and F of Part 172 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A vehicle transporting not more than 20 pounds of smokeless powder or not more than five pounds of black sporting powder or any combination thereof.

(2) The operation of a vehicle excepted by subdivision (b) of Section 34501.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 219, Sec. 6.   (SB 891)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27904.

There shall be displayed in a conspicuous place on both the right and left sides of a pilot car a sign showing the name of the company which owns or operates the pilot car. The name shall contrast with the background and shall be of a size, shape, and color as to be readily legible during daylight hours from a distance of 50 feet. Additional markings which do not interfere with the legibility of the name may also be displayed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 460, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

27904.5.

Subject to Section 35783.5, a pilot car shall display neat, clean, and legible signs containing the word “OVERSIZE.” The words “OVERSIZE LOAD,” “WIDE LOAD,” or “LONG LOAD” may be substituted as applicable. The sign shall be a minimum of 48 inches above the ground and shall be legible at 45 degrees from either side when read from the front or rear. The sign shall have a bright yellow background with a minimum projected area of 440 square inches. The lettering shall be black with a 1-inch minimum brush stroke width and a 6-inch minimum letter height.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 460, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

27905.

It is unlawful to display on a vehicle any sign with the words “fire” or “fire department” thereon, except on vehicles owned and operated by a regularly organized fire department, fire district, forestry service, or the State Fire Marshal’s Office, and on the privately owned vehicles of any regular member of any such fire departments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

27906.

(a) Every schoolbus, while being used for the transportation of school pupils at or below the 12th-grade level shall bear upon the front and rear of the bus a plainly visible sign containing the word “schoolbus” in letters not less than eight inches in height. The letters on schoolbus signs shall be of proportionate width.

 Except as provided in subdivision (b), no other vehicle shall display a sign containing the word “schoolbus.”

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a schoolbus which is also used to transport persons of any
 age who are developmentally disabled, as defined by the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code), may display a sign containing the word “schoolbus” while transporting those persons to or from vocational, prevocational, or work training centers sponsored by the State Department of Developmental Services.

(c) Every schoolbus, when operated for the transportation of school pupils at or below the 12th-grade level, shall bear upon the rear of the bus, below the rear windows, a plainly visible sign containing the words “Stop When Red Lights Flash” in letters not less than six inches in height. The letters on schoolbus signs shall be of proportionate width.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 678, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

27906.5.

Every youth bus, when operated for the transportation of school pupils, shall bear, upon the front and rear of the youth bus, a plainly visible sign containing the words “YOUTH BUS” in letters not less than eight inches in height. The letters on youth bus signs shall be of proportionate width and the letters shall be in sharp contrast to the background.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 383, Sec. 6.   Effective July 4, 1982.   Operative on date (not sooner than October 1, 1982, or later than January 1, 1983) prescribed by Sec. 13 of Ch. 383.)
-------------------------------------------

27906.7.

(a) A school district, county office of education, or charter school using a zero-emission schoolbus to transport pupils at or below the 12th-grade level may place signage on the rear of the zero-emission
 schoolbus that identifies the schoolbus as a clean air
 zero-emission bus. The signage may specify the fuel type of the zero-emission schoolbus.

(b) The Department of the California Highway Patrol may issue guidelines governing the size and placement of the signage described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27907.

There shall be displayed in a conspicuous place on both the right and left side of a tow truck, a repossessor’s tow vehicle, or an automobile dismantler’s tow vehicle used to tow or carry vehicles a sign showing the name of the company or the owner or operator of the tow truck or tow vehicle. The sign shall also contain the business address and telephone number of the owner or driver. The letters and numbers of the sign shall not be less than 2 inches in height and shall be in contrast to the color of the background upon which they are placed.

A person licensed as a repossession agency pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, or a registrant of the agency, may use the license number issued to the agency by the Department of Consumer Affairs in lieu of a name, business address, and telephone number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 456, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

27908.

(a) In every taxicab operated in this state there shall be a sign of heavy material, not smaller than 6 inches by 4 inches, or such other size as the agency regulating the operation of the taxicab provides for other notices or signs required to be in every taxicab, securely attached and clearly displayed in view of the passenger at all times, providing in letters as large as the size of the sign will reasonably allow, all of the following information:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the agency regulating the operation of the taxicab.

(2) The name, address, and telephone number of the firm licensed or controlled by the agency regulating the operation of the taxicab.

(b) In the event more than one local regulatory agency has jurisdiction over the operation of the taxicab, the notice required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall provide the name, address, and telephone number of the agency having jurisdiction in the area where the taxicab operator conducts its greatest volume of business; or, if this cannot readily be ascertained, the agency having jurisdiction in the area where the taxicab operator maintains its offices or primary place of business, provided that the operator conducts a substantial volume of business in such area; or, if neither of the foregoing provisions apply, any agency having jurisdiction of an area where the taxicab operator conducts a substantial volume of business.

(c) As used in this section, “taxicab” means a passenger vehicle designed for carrying not more than eight persons, excluding the driver, and used to carry passengers for hire. “Taxicab” shall not include a charter-party carrier of passengers within the meaning of the Passenger Charter-party Carriers’ Act, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5351) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1158.)
-------------------------------------------

27909.

Any vehicle which carries liquefied petroleum gas fuel or natural gas, in a tank attached to a vehicle, in any concealed area, including trunks, compartments, or under the vehicle, shall display on the exterior of the vehicle the letters “CNG,” “LNG,” or “LPG,” whichever type fuel is utilized, in block letters at least one inch high. The letters shall be of contrasting color and shall be placed as near as possible to the area of the location of the tank. Any vehicle fueled by liquefied petroleum gas fuel or by natural gas may also comply with this section by displaying on each side of the vehicle words or letters at least 0.25 inch high indicating
 that the vehicle is fueled by liquefied petroleum gas or natural gas. It is unlawful to dispense liquefied petroleum gas fuel or natural gas into any tank in a concealed area of any vehicle registered in California, unless the vehicle complies with the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 171.)
-------------------------------------------

27910.

The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall initiate a 12-month study to determine an effective means to enforce the provisions of the Commercial Vehicle Registration Act of 2001. The Department of the California Highway Patrol, after consultation with representatives from the Department of Transportation, the Board of Equalization, the Department of Motor Vehicles, and the commercial vehicle industry, shall provide, on or before July 1, 2003, recommendations to the Legislature for actions to be taken to ensure compliance
 with that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 55.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Refrigeration Equipment [28000. - 28000.]

28000.

Every refrigerator van equipped with one or more doors designed to lock automatically upon closure shall have at least one door which can be opened from inside the van as an emergency means of exit.

For the purposes of this article, “refrigerator van” means any motor truck, semitrailer, or trailer, with a fully enclosed cargo body having an enclosed volume of 15 cubic feet or more, which utilizes a mechanical refrigeration system to reduce the temperature within the enclosed portion of the vehicle to 32 degrees Fahrenheit or less, or which provides refrigeration by the use of dry ice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1335.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Odometers [28050. - 28053.]

28050.

It is unlawful for any person to advertise for sale, to sell, to use, or to install on any part of a motor vehicle or on an odometer in a motor vehicle any device which causes the odometer to register any mileage other than the true mileage driven. For the purposes of this section the true mileage driven is that mileage driven by the car as registered by the odometer within the manufacturer’s designed tolerance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1109.)
-------------------------------------------

28050.5.

It is unlawful for any person with the intent to defraud to operate a motor vehicle on any street or highway knowing that the odometer of such vehicle is disconnected or nonfunctional.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1210.)
-------------------------------------------

28051.

It is unlawful for any person to disconnect, turn back, advance, or reset the odometer of any motor vehicle with the intent to alter the number of miles indicated on the odometer gauge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 774.)
-------------------------------------------

28051.5.

It is unlawful for any person to advertise for sale, to sell, or to use, any device designed primarily for the purpose of turning back or resetting the odometer of any motor vehicle to reduce the number of miles indicated on the odometer gauge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 841.)
-------------------------------------------

28052.

If a manufacturer, distributor, or dealer of a new motor vehicle makes any warranty to the purchaser of, and with respect to, a new motor vehicle which is based on the amount of miles that the motor vehicle is driven, only those miles which the motor vehicle has been driven on and after the date that the motor vehicle has first been sold as new to the purchaser shall be considered for purposes of the warranty.

The mileage indicated upon the odometer of the motor vehicle on the date that the motor vehicle is first sold as new to the purchaser shall, for purposes of the warranty, be the mileage upon which the warranty shall
 commence.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve any person of any criminal punishment to which he would otherwise be subject under Section 28051.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to motor vehicles which are sold on or after the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 111.)
-------------------------------------------

28053.

(a) Nothing in this article prevents the service, repair, or replacement of an odometer, if the mileage indicated thereon remains the same as before the service, repair, or replacement. If the odometer is incapable of registering the same mileage as before the service, repair, or replacement, the odometer shall be adjusted to read zero and a notice in writing shall be attached to the left doorframe of the vehicle by the person performing the service, repair, or replacement specifying the mileage prior to the service, repair or replacement of the odometer and the date on which it was serviced, repaired, or replaced.

(b) No person shall fail to adjust an odometer or affix a notice regarding the adjustment as required by subdivision (a).

(c) No person shall, with intent to defraud, remove or alter any notice affixed to a vehicle pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 130, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Fire Extinguishers [28060. - 28062.]

28060.

(a) No person shall sell or offer for sale a new recreational vehicle or new camper which is equipped with cooking equipment or heating equipment, and no dealer or person holding a retail seller’s permit shall sell or offer for sale a used recreational vehicle or a used camper which is equipped with cooking or heating equipment, unless such new or used vehicle or new or used camper is equipped with at least one fire extinguisher, filled and ready for use, of the dry chemical or carbon dioxide type with an aggregate rating of at least 4-B:C units, which meets the requirements specified in Section 13162 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The operator of a recreational vehicle, or a vehicle to which a camper is attached, which recreational vehicle or camper is equipped with a fire extinguisher as required by subdivision (a), shall carry such fire extinguisher in such recreational vehicle or camper and shall maintain the fire extinguisher in an efficient operating condition.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Cooking equipment” means a device designed for cooking which utilizes combustible material, including, but not limited to, materials such as charcoal or any flammable gas or liquid, and “heating equipment” means a device designed for heating which utilizes combustible material, including, but not limited to, materials such as charcoal or any flammable gas or liquid.

(2) “Recreational
 vehicle” has the same meaning as defined in Section 18010.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 392.)
-------------------------------------------

28062.

(a) A modified limousine shall be equipped with two readily accessible and fully charged fire extinguishers having at least a 2A10BC 5 pound rating and maintained in efficient operating condition. One fire extinguisher shall be securely mounted in the driver’s compartment and at least one shall be accessible to the passengers.

(b) The driver or operator of a modified limousine shall notify the passengers of the location of each fire extinguisher prior to the commencement of any trip.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 860, Sec. 15.   (SB 611)   Effective September 30, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11.5. Bumpers [28070. - 28071.]

28070.

As used in this article, “passenger vehicle” means “passenger vehicle” as defined in Section 34710.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

28071.

Every passenger vehicle registered in this state shall be equipped with a front bumper and with a rear bumper. As used in this section, “bumper” means any device designed and intended by a manufacturer to prevent the front or rear of the body of the vehicle from coming into contact with any other motor vehicle. This section shall not apply to any passenger vehicle that is required to be equipped with an energy absorption system pursuant to either state or federal law, or to any passenger vehicle which was not equipped with a front or rear bumper, or both, at the time that it was first sold and registered under the laws of this or any other state or foreign
 jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 451.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Camper Signaling Devices [28080. - 28081.]

28080.

(a) Every motor vehicle upon which a camper is mounted shall be equipped with an audible or visual signaling device which can be activated from inside the camper and which is constructed so as to allow any person inside the camper to gain the attention of the driver of the motor vehicle. In no event shall a horn, as required by Section 27000, be used to comply with this subdivision.

(b) No person shall drive a motor vehicle upon which is mounted a camper containing any passenger unless the motor vehicle is equipped as required by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 292.)
-------------------------------------------

28081.

The provisions of Section 28080 shall not apply to either of the following:

(a) Any motor vehicle upon which a camper is mounted if a person is able to move between the cab portion of the motor vehicle and the camper.

(b) Any motor vehicle upon which a camper is mounted, which motor vehicle is equipped with a sliding or removable rear window which can be opened or removed by a person inside such camper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 292.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Theft Alarm System [28085. - 28085.]

28085.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with a theft alarm system which flashes the lights of the vehicle, or sounds an audible signal, or both, and which operates as follows:

(a) The system may flash any of the lights required or permitted on the vehicle.

(b) The system may sound an audible signal.

(c) No vehicle shall be equipped with a theft alarm system which emits the
 sound of a siren.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Cellular Telephones [28090. - 28090.]

28090.

Every renter of a motor vehicle with cellular radio telephone equipment shall provide the person who rents the motor vehicle with written operating instructions concerning the safe use of the equipment. The equipment shall also be clearly labeled with operating instructions concerning the safe use of the equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1306, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Pilot Cars [28100. - 28103.]

28100.

A pilot car shall display at least one red warning flag on each side of the vehicle. The flags shall be a minimum of 16 inches square, and shall be mounted so as to be visible from both the front and rear of the vehicle. The flags shall be removed or covered when the vehicle is not operating as a pilot car.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 460, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

28101.

In addition to the lighting, sign, and flag requirements in Sections 25270, 27904, 27904.5, and 28100, a pilot car shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Be a vehicle not less than 60 inches in width.

(b) Be equipped with all of the following:

(1) One STOP/SLOW paddle.

(2) One orange vest, shirt, or jacket.

(3) One red hand
 flag (24 inches square).

(4) One two-way radio communication device.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 460, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

28102.

Pilot cars equipped with vertical clearance measuring devices shall comply with Section 35252.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 460, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

28103.

It is unlawful and an infraction for any person to violate any provision of this article or to fail to have any required equipment in good working order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 460, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Methanol or Ethanol Fueled Vehicles [28110. - 28114.]

28110.

As used in this article, “antisiphoning device” means a device which prevents the removal by suction of fuel from a motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1301, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

28111.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 28112, any 1993 and later model-year vehicle which is capable of operating on methanol or ethanol and is imported into the state, or sold, purchased, leased, rented, or acquired in the state, shall be equipped with an antisiphoning device.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1301, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

28112.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 28111, the State Air Resources Board may adopt regulations providing for exemptions from antisiphoning device requirements for categories of vehicles of 1993 and later model-years which it determines not susceptible to siphoning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1301, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

28113.

(a) Every light-duty and medium-duty motor vehicle operated for compensation to transport persons in an air quality management district or air pollution control district, which does not meet all applicable state ambient air quality standards, shall be a low-emission vehicle, as defined by regulation of the State Air Resources Board. If the vehicle is capable of operating on more than one fuel, it shall be operated within any nonattainment area to the maximum extent practicable either on the designated clean fuel on which the low-emission vehicle was certified or on any other fuel designated by the State Air Resources Board as a
 substitute fuel for the designated clean fuel. Any air quality management district or air pollution control district may adopt regulations for the enforcement of this section which are consistent with regulations of the State Air Resources Board. 

(b) As used in this section, “motor vehicle operated for compensation to transport persons” includes a taxi cab, bus, airport shuttle vehicle, transit authority or transit district vehicle, or a vehicle owned by a private entity providing transit service under contract with a transit district or transportation authority.

(c) As used in this section, “light-duty” has the same meaning as defined in Section 39035 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(d) As used in this section, “medium-duty” has the same meaning as defined in Section 39037.5 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(e) This section applies to all new light-duty motor vehicles purchased on or after January 1, 1997, and to all new medium-duty vehicles purchased on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 496, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

28114.

(a) Every heavy-duty vehicle operated by a transit authority or transit district, or owned by a private entity providing transit service under contract with a transit district or transportation authority, and used to transport persons for compensation shall meet the emission standards adopted by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 43806 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(b) As used in this section, “heavy-duty” has the same meaning as defined in Section 39033 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(c) This section applies to all new heavy-duty motor vehicles purchased on or after January 1, 1996, and all new or replacement engines purchased on or after January 1, 1996, for use in heavy-duty vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 496, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Jamming Devices [28150. - 28150.]

28150.

(a) No vehicle shall be equipped with any device that is designed for, or is capable of, jamming, scrambling, neutralizing, disabling, or otherwise interfering with radar, laser, or any other electronic device used by a law enforcement agency to measure the speed of moving objects.

(b) No person shall use, buy, possess, manufacture, sell, or otherwise distribute any device that is designed for jamming, scrambling, neutralizing, disabling, or otherwise interfering with radar,
 laser, or any other electronic device used by a law enforcement agency to measure the speed of moving objects.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) is an infraction.

(d) When a person possesses four or more devices in violation of subdivision (b), the person is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who has a valid federal license for operating the devices described in this section may transport one or more of those devices if the license is carried in the vehicle transporting the device at all times when the device is being transported.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 493, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17.5. Driver Monitoring Defeat Devices [28155. - 28155.]

28155.

(a) A vehicle shall not be equipped with a device that is specifically designed for, marketed for, or being used for, neutralizing, disabling, or otherwise interfering with a driver monitoring system that is engaged when drivers are utilizing advanced driver assistance system features or autonomous technology, as defined in Section 38750.

(b) A person shall not use, buy, possess, manufacture, sell,
 advertise for sale, or otherwise distribute a device that is specifically designed for neutralizing, disabling, or otherwise interfering with a driver monitoring system that is engaged when drivers are utilizing advanced driver assistance system features or autonomous technology, as defined in Section 38750. 

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) or (b) is an infraction.

(d) All of the following are
 exempt from subdivision (a) or (b):

(1) A manufacturer while operating under a testing permit issued pursuant to Section 38750.

(2) A person or entity conducting motor vehicle diagnostic services, repairs, or enhancements consistent with the original equipment manufacturer’s safety standards, whether physically or remotely.

(3) In connection with an update or enhancement of the driver monitoring system by the original equipment manufacturer.

(4) In connection with a repair of a vehicle malfunction corrected by the manufacturer or manufacturer-approved third-party vendor.

(5) To remedy a defect corrected by the manufacturer or manufacturer-approved third-party vendor.

(6) For modifications or compliance pursuant to applicable provisions of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.).

(e) For purposes of this section,
 “advanced driver assistance system” means Level 2 of SAE International’s Taxonomy and Definitions for Terms Related to Driving Automation Systems for On-Road Motor Vehicles, standard J3016 (APR 2021).

(f) For purposes of this section, a “direct driver monitoring system” includes exterior camera systems, interior camera systems, or other detection devices designed specifically to
 monitor the alertness of the driver while advanced driver assistance system technology or autonomous technology that meets the definition of a Level 3, 4 or 5 SAE International’s Taxonomy and Definitions for Terms Related to Driving Automation Systems for On-Road Motor Vehicles, standard J3016 (APR2021) is engaged, systems that require a driver to maintain their hands on the steering wheel, pressure sensors, safety sensors, distracted driver sensors, systems that help the driver to continue to pay attention to the traffic situation, systems that warn the driver when the driver is distracted, and any other system that has been shown to be effective in monitoring drivers
 while they are utilizing advanced driver assistance system or autonomous technology.

(g) This section shall not be construed to do either of the following:

(1) Restrict or prohibit access to a motor vehicle’s onboard computer systems to conduct diagnostics, repairs, or enhancements consistent with the original equipment manufacturer’s safety standards, whether physically or remotely.

(2) Prevent a person from taking immediate steps to protect the life or
 physical safety of the driver or other people in the vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 604, Sec. 1.   (SB 1313)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Child Safety Alert System [28160. - 28160.]

28160.

(a) On or before January 1, 2018, the department shall adopt regulations governing the specifications, installation, and use of child safety alert systems.

(b) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraphs (B) and (C), on or before March 1, 2019, each schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, except school pupil activity buses described in paragraph (2), youth bus, and child care motor vehicle shall be equipped with an operational child safety alert system.

(B) If a school district, county office of education, or charter school with an average daily attendance of 4,000 pupils or fewer, or a private school with 4,000 pupils or fewer in attendance, cannot meet the
 requirements of this section on or before March 1, 2019, the school district, county office of education, charter school, or private school shall submit to the department, on or before March 1, 2019, documentation that demonstrates that it has, before March 1, 2019, ordered or purchased the child safety alert system or child safety alert systems, and includes an estimate of repairs or installation, the total number of vehicles described in subparagraph (A) in the fleet and the number of vehicles described in subparagraph (A) that do not have an installed child safety alert system, the proposed date of installation, and the name of the vendor or individual who will install the child safety alert system or child safety alert systems. Upon providing this documentation, the school district, county office of education, charter school, or private school shall have an additional six months, not to extend beyond September 1, 2019, to meet the requirements of this section.

(C) Any entity other than a school district, county office of education, charter school, or private school that operates a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, except school pupil activity buses described in paragraph (2), youth bus, or child care motor vehicle that is subject to the requirements of this section may submit documentation as specified in subparagraph (B) to the department. Upon providing this documentation, the entity shall have an additional six months, not to extend beyond September 1, 2019, to meet the requirements of this section.

(D) This section shall apply to all school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, and private schools, including those that began the 2018–19 school year before September 1, 2018.

(2) A school pupil activity bus is not required to be equipped with an
 operational child safety alert system if all of the following apply:

(A) The school pupil activity bus is not used exclusively to transport pupils.

(B) When the school pupil activity bus is used to transport pupils, the pupils are accompanied by at least one adult chaperone selected by a school official. If an adult chaperone is not a school employee, the chaperone shall meet the requirements for a school volunteer established by the policies of the school district, county office of education, charter school, or private school.

(C) One adult chaperone has a list of every pupil and adult chaperone, including a school employee, who is on the school pupil activity bus at the time of departure.

(D) The driver has reviewed all safety and emergency procedures
 before the initial departure and the driver and adult chaperone have signed a form with the time and date acknowledging that the safety plan and procedures were reviewed.

(E) Immediately before departure from any location, the adult chaperone shall account for each pupil on the list of pupils, verify the number of pupils to the driver, and sign a form indicating that all pupils are present or accounted for.

(F) After pupils have exited a school pupil activity bus, and before driving away, the driver shall check all areas of the bus, including, but not limited to, overhead compartments and bathrooms, to ensure that the bus is vacant.

(G) The driver shall sign a form with the time and date verifying that all required procedures have been followed.

(H) The
 information required to be recorded pursuant to subparagraphs (D), (E), and (G) may be recorded on a single form. These forms shall be retained by the school district, county office of education, charter school, or private school for a minimum of two years.

(c) The department shall consult with the State Department of Education to develop frequently asked questions related to the implementation of this section and of Section 1294 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations. The department shall also consult with, at a minimum, the California Association of School Transportation Officials when developing the frequently asked questions. The department and the State Department of Education shall each post the frequently asked questions on their respective Internet Web sites.

(d) A “child safety alert system” is a device located at the interior rear of a vehicle that requires
 the driver to either manually contact or scan the device before exiting the vehicle, thereby prompting the driver to inspect the entirety of the interior of the vehicle before exiting.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Child care motor vehicle” means a vehicle designed, used, or maintained for more than eight persons, including the driver, that is used by a child care provider to transport children.

(2) “Child care provider” has the same meaning as provided for “day care center” in Section 1596.76 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 426, Sec. 34.   (AB 1840)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Connected Vehicle Service [28200. - 28246.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [28200. - 28210.]

28200.

Unless the context requires otherwise, for purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Account holder” means a person who is a party to or a user of services provided under a contract for connected vehicle service with a covered provider, and includes, but is not limited to, a subscriber, customer, or registered user.

(b) “Connected vehicle location access” is a type of connected vehicle service that allows a person who is outside of a vehicle, excluding a covered provider or vehicle cellular data provider, to view or track the location of the vehicle, including, but not limited to, a location determined by a
 Global Positioning System (GPS), whether through the internet, an app-based technology, or any other remote wireless connectivity technology.

(c) “Connected vehicle service” means a software application that is designed to be operated on a mobile device provided by or on behalf of a vehicle manufacturer that enables a person, excluding a covered provider or vehicle cellular data provider, to remotely obtain
 the location of the vehicle or send data from, or send commands to, a vehicle.

(d) “Connected vehicle service account” means an account or other means by which a person enrolls in or obtains access to a connected vehicle service.

(e) “Connected vehicle service request” means a request by a person to terminate another person’s access to connected vehicle service.

(f) “Covered provider” means a vehicle manufacturer or an entity acting on behalf of the vehicle manufacturer that provides connected vehicle service.

(g) “Requestor” means any person submitting a connected vehicle service request consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 28224.
